src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
* **LEXICON NominalFormsV6** presence participe

* **LEXICON NominalFormsV8**  gerund, verbabessive

* **LEXICON NominalFormsV9**  supine

* **LEXICON NominalFormsC1**  for cons final stems: infinitive, supine, actio, gerund, perfect participe, preterite negation form

* **LEXICON NominalFormsC2**  for cons final stems: presence participe

# Derivation

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsC**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsCTV**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsBOAHTI**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsRAIMMAHALLA** no NomAg/actor

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsBOAHTALADDA**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsDIEHTALADDA**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsDIEHTI**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsBIEHTTI**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsDIEHTISHORT**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsDIEHTILONGSHORT**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsBAHCCI**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsDOHPPE-**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsGARRE-**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsCIRRO-**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsORRO-**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsCIRROTV-**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJTV**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsMUITALTV**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsMUITTASJTV**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsMUITAL**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsNUOSKIT**

* **LEXICON DeverbalNounsMUITTASJ**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBOAHTI**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBINDU**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBORRA**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsFALLA**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBOLTU**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBEAHTTI**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsARVI**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsFAHTE**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsGILLE**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsCOHKKA**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBORGE**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsMUITAL**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsVUORDIL**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsALIST**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsSUOTNJAL**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBOTNJAS**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsLASSAN**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsCOASKKIT**

* **LEXICON DeverbalVerbsARVIL**

* LEXICON VGEN flag for VGen

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sme/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
